District of Columbia statutes.
34-2113

Use of funds from General Fund for certain sewers.

Nothing herein contained shall prohibit the use of funds deposited to the credit of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as established by the Revenue Funds Availability Act of 1975 [D.C. Law 1-42] from being used for the construction, expansion, relocation, replacement, or renovation of any sewer in the combined sewer system of the District.

History

May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 109, ch. 218, title II, § 215
Jan. 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42, §§ 3(f)(6), 8, 22 DCR 6315

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1613.
1973 Ed., § 43-1614.

References in Text

The Revenue Funds Availability Act of 1975, referred to in this section, is the Act of January 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42.